Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall develop and implement
simplified certification and recertification requirements for

HB1111 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Supp lemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits for an
individual who:
1. Is sixty (60) years of age or older or is a person with a
disability, as determined by Department rule;
2. Has no earned income; and
3. Resides in a household in which every individual residing in
the household is sixty (60) years of age or older or is a person
with a disability, as determined by Department rule.
B. The simplified requirements must:
1. Allow an individual described by this section to waive
recertification requirements;
2. Simplify and reduce the number of verification requirements
for certifying and recertifying the eligibility to receive benefits,
which must include the use of a shortened application form; and
3. Allow the individual to remain eligible for benefits for
thirty-six (36) months after recertification and after each
recertification.
C. An individual described by this section is required to
report to the Department, in accordance with federal law, when the
individual receives an increase in income.
D. The Department shall, in manner that complies with federal
law, use data matching to inform eligible individuals.


HB1111 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.6 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For purposes of determining eligibility and benefit amounts
under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), an
increase in the standard medical deduction is established for
households with elderly or disabled individuals as follows:
A. 1. The increased medical deduction applies to households
with elderly individuals, who are sixty (60) years of age or older,
or disabled individuals who are applicants for or recipients of SNAP
benefits.
2. The deduction is available to households that incur medical
expenses during the taxable year for the elderly or disabled
individuals of the household.
B. 1. The Department of Human Services shall establish a
standard medical expense deduction for households with verified out-
of-pocket medical expenses that meet eligibility criteria under
SNAP.
2. The standard medical expense deduction shall be set at a
value determined by the Department in accordance with federal
guidelines and requirements for cost neutrality to the Food and
Nutrition Services of the United States Department of Agriculture.
The established standard medical expense deduction shall be no less
than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to ensure meaningful benefit to
HB1111 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

elig ible households while maintaining compliance with waiver
approval criteria.
3. The Department shall submit a request to the Food and
Nutrition Services of the United States Department of Agriculture
for a waiver to implement the standard medical expense deduction by
January 1, 2026.
C. For purposes of this section, "qualified medical expenses"
shall include, but not be limited to, expenses for prescription
medications, doctor's visits, medical supplies, and other costs that
meet the definition of medical expenses under federal or state law
as applicable to public assistance programs.
D. 1. The deduction under this section shall not exceed the
amounts specified in subsection B of this section.
2. Any portion of the medical deduction not used in the current
fiscal year shall not be carried over to the next year.
E. The provisions of this section shall apply to all
applications and recertifications for SNAP benefits filed on or
after November 1, 2025, and shall be implemented in accordance with
the regulations set forth by the Department of Human Services.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.


HB1111 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.